Nevada, session 83, SB197.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 178 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Before a prosecuting agency places a law enforcement
officer or employee of a law enforcement agency on a Brady-
Giglio list, the prosecuting agency shall send to the officer or
employee written notice of the potential placement of the officer or
employee on the Brady-Giglio list. The notice must include,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the officer or employee may be placed on
the Brady-Giglio list maintained by the prosecuting agency;
(b) Notice of the right of the officer or employee to:
(1) Request that the prosecuting agency provide to the
officer or employee any document, record or other evidence
possessed by the prosecuting agency and relevant to its
determination concerning whether to place the officer or employee
on a Brady-Giglio list; and
(2) Provide input to the prosecuting agency concerning
placement on a Brady-Giglio list before the prosecuting agency
may place the officer or employee on any such list; and
(c) Information concerning any procedural requirements
applicable to the exercise of a right described in paragraph (b).
2. Upon making a determination to place a law enforcement
officer or employee of a law enforcement agency on a Brady-
Giglio list, the prosecuting agency shall send to the officer or
employee written notice of the placement of the officer or
employee on the Brady-Giglio list. The notice must include,
without limitation:
(a) A statement that the officer or employee has been placed
on the Brady-Giglio list maintained by the prosecuting agency;
(b) Notice of the right of the officer or employee to request that
the prosecuting agency reconsider the placement of the officer or
employee on the Brady-Giglio list; and
(c) Information concerning any procedural requirements
applicable to the exercise of a right described in paragraph (b),
including, without limitation, the time frame and manner in which
the officer or employee must submit a request for reconsideration
-
*SB197*

– 3 –
of the placement of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio
list.
3. If a law enforcement officer or employee of a law
enforcement agency:
(a) Does not submit a request for reconsideration of placement
on a Brady-Giglio list or fails to comply with a procedural
requirement applicable to the submission of a request for
reconsideration of placement on a Brady-Giglio list, the officer or
employee must remain on the Brady-Giglio list until such time as
the prosecuting agency determines that the conduct of the officer
or employee no longer warrants inclusion of the officer or
employee on the Brady-Giglio list.
(b) Submits a request for reconsideration of placement on a
Brady-Giglio list, the prosecuting agency shall:
(1) Approve the request and remove the officer or employee
from the Brady-Giglio list if the prosecuting agency determines
that the conduct of the officer or employee does not warrant
inclusion of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list.
(2) Deny the request if the prosecuting agency determines
that the conduct of the officer or employee warrants inclusion of
the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list. An officer or
employee whose request for reconsideration is denied shall remain
on the Brady-Giglio list until such time as the prosecuting agency
determines that the conduct of the officer or employee no longer
warrants inclusion of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio
list.
4. A prosecuting agency shall send the notice required by
subsections 1 and 2 by mail or electronic mail to the current or
last known place of employment of the law enforcement officer or
employee of a law enforcement agency. Upon receipt of any such
notice, the employer shall:
(a) Deliver the notice to the officer or employee to whom the
notice pertains, if the officer or employee is employed by the
employer.
(b) Send the notice by mail or electronic mail to the current or
last known address of the officer or employee to whom the notice
pertains, if the officer or employee is no longer employed by the
employer.
5. A prosecuting agency that maintains a Brady-Giglio list
shall adopt a policy concerning the placement of a law
enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency on a
Brady-Giglio list. The policy must:
(a) Provide the rights described in subsections 1 and 2 to
officers and employees;
(b) Include, without limitation:
-
*SB197*

– 4 –
(1) The criteria used by the prosecuting agency to
determine whether to place an officer or employee on a Brady-
Giglio list; and
(2) The time frame within which the prosecuting agency
must provide the notice required by subsections 1 and 2; and
(c) Prescribe procedural requirements applicable to the
exercise of a right described in subsection 1 or 2.
6. Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (b) or required
by federal or state law or court order, a prosecuting agency:
(a) Shall not disclose any information maintained by the
prosecuting agency relating to a law enforcement officer or
employee of a law enforcement agency who may be called as a
witness in a criminal case.
(b) May disclose the information described in paragraph (a) to
an officer or employee described in paragraph (a) or the legal
counsel of any such officer or employee upon the request of the
officer or employee.
7. The rights provided by this section are in addition to any
rights negotiated pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement
and any other rights recognized by law.
8. Nothing in this section shall be construed to:
(a) Limit the ability of a prosecuting agency to remove a law
enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement agency
from a Brady-Giglio list if the prosecuting agency determines that
the conduct of the officer or employee no longer warrants
inclusion of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list.
(b) Affect any obligation placed upon a prosecuting attorney
by the Nevada Constitution or the United States Constitution.
(c) Prohibit a law enforcement officer or employee of a law
enforcement agency from bringing a private cause of action for
damages resulting from the placement of the officer or employee
on a Brady-Giglio list.
9. As used in this section:
(a) “Brady-Giglio list” means a system, index, list or other
record established and maintained by a prosecuting agency for the
purpose of satisfying the obligation of the prosecuting agency to
disclose exculpatory evidence to a defendant pursuant to Brady v.
Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963) and Giglio v. United States, 405
U.S. 150 (1972).
(b) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(1) The sheriff’s office of a county;
(2) A metropolitan police department; or
(3) A police department of an incorporated city.
-
*SB197*

– 5 –
(c) “Prosecuting agency” includes the Attorney General and
the district attorney or city attorney of any county or city,
respectively.
Sec. 2. 1. Not more than 90 days after July 1, 2025, a
prosecuting agency that maintains a Brady-Giglio list shall send to
each law enforcement officer or employee of a law enforcement
agency whose name is included on the Brady-Giglio list maintained
by the prosecuting agency on July 1, 2025, written notice of the
right of the officer or employee to request that the prosecuting
agency reconsider the placement of the officer or employee on the
Brady-Giglio list. The notice must:
(a) Be sent in the manner described in subsection 4 of section 1
of this act; and
(b) Include, without limitation, the information described in
subsection 2 of section 1 of this act.
2. If a law enforcement officer or employee of a law
enforcement agency who receives the notice required by
subsection 1:
(a) Does not submit a request for reconsideration of the
placement of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list or
fails to comply with a procedural requirement applicable to the
submission of any such request, the officer or employee must
remain on the Brady-Giglio list until such time as the prosecuting
agency determines that the conduct of the officer or employee no
longer warrants inclusion of the officer or employee on the Brady-
Giglio list.
(b) Submits a request for reconsideration of the placement of the
officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list, the prosecuting agency
shall:
(1) Approve the request and remove the officer or employee
from the Brady-Giglio list if the prosecuting agency determines that
the conduct of the officer or employee does not warrant inclusion of
the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list.
(2) Deny the request if the prosecuting agency determines
that the conduct of the officer or employee warrants inclusion of the
officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio list. An officer or employee
whose request for reconsideration is denied shall remain on the
Brady-Giglio list until such time as the prosecuting agency
determines that the conduct of the officer or employee no longer
warrants inclusion of the officer or employee on the Brady-Giglio
list.
3. As used in this section:
(a) “Brady-Giglio list” has the meaning ascribed to it in section
1 of this act.
-
*SB197*

– 6 –
(b) “Law enforcement agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 1 of this act.
(c) “Prosecuting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
section 1 of this act.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB197*